North Carolina statutes. Chapter 32A. Powers of Attorney.
Article 2A. Authority of Attorney-In-Fact to Make Gifts and to Renounce.

§§ 32A-14.1,
32A-14.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018.

History.

G.S. 32A-14.1; 1995, c. 331, s. 5; 1999-456, s. 2; 2001-413, s. 5.2; repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018. G.S. 32A-14.2; 2009-48, s. 14; repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018.

Cross References.

For similar current provisions, see the North Carolina Uniform Power of Attorney Act,

G.S. 32C-1-101

et seq.

Editor’s Note.

Former G.S. 32A-14.1 pertained to gifts under power of attorney. Former G.S. 32A-14.2 pertained to renunciation under power of attorney.

§§ 32A-14.3 through 32A-14.9.

Reserved for future codification purposes.